Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.04.030

Registered name.

A foreign corporation may register its corporate name in accordance with RCW 23.95.315.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2116; 1989 c 165 s 39.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.